Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-374
Operation of vehicle without registration; prospective buyer; conditions; special permit; fee.

Motor vehicles or trailers owned by a dealer and bearing dealer number plates may be operated or towed upon the highways for demonstration purposes by any prospective buyer thereof for a period of forty-eight hours. Motor vehicles or trailers owned and held for sale by a dealer and bearing such dealer number plates may be operated or towed upon the highways for a period of forty-eight hours as service loaner vehicles by customers having their vehicles repaired by the dealer. Upon delivery of such motor vehicle or trailer to such prospective buyer for demonstration purposes or to a service customer, the dealer shall deliver to the prospective buyer or service customer a card or certificate giving the name and address of the dealer, the name and address of the prospective buyer or service customer, and the date and hour of such delivery and the products to be hauled, if any, under a special permit. The special permit and card or certificate shall be in such form as shall be prescribed by the department and shall be carried by such prospective buyer or service customer while operating such motor vehicle or towing such trailer. The department shall charge ten dollars for each special permit issued under this section.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 74.